Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.220

Process, to whom directed.

Unless otherwise provided by statute, all process issuing out of the court shall be directed to the sheriff of the county in which it is to be served, and be by him or her executed according to law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 20; 1891 c 45 s 5; RRS s 35.]